Hawaii statutes.
[§445-134.19] Conformity with
federal law. Every pawn transaction agreement that complies with the
disclosure requirements of the federal Truth in Lending Act as of the date upon
which the pawn transaction agreement is signed shall be deemed to comply with
the disclosure provisions of this part. [L 1992, c 192, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next